Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.510

Payment on withdrawal—Reentry.

(1) Should a member cease to be employed by an employer and request upon a form provided by the department a refund of the member's accumulated contributions with interest, this amount shall be paid to the individual less any withdrawal fee which may be assessed by the director which shall be deposited in the department of retirement systems expense fund.

(2) A member who files a request for a refund and subsequently enters into employment with an employer prior to the refund being made shall not be eligible for a refund. For purposes of this section, a written or oral employment agreement shall be considered entering into employment.

[ 1994 c 197 s 18; 1994 c 177 s 6; 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 15; 1969 ex.s. c 150 s 17; 1963 ex.s. c 14 s 17; 1955 c 274 s 24; 1947 c 80 s 51; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-70. Prior: 1941 c 97 s 6, part; 1939 c 86 s 6, part; 1937 c 221 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4995-7, part.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1994 c 177 s 6 and by 1994 c 197 s 18, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.

Findings—1994 c 177: See note following RCW 41.50.125.

Effective dates—1982 1st ex.s. c 52: See note following RCW 2.10.180.

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 150: See note following RCW 41.50.200.

Savings—Severability—Effective date—1963 ex.s. c 14: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.